Utah statutes.
10-6-122.   Purchasing procedures and file of bids received and proof of advertisement -- Time for keeping.

(1)  All purchases or encumbrances thereof by a city shall be made or incurred according to the purchasing procedures established by each city by ordinance or resolution and only on an order or approval of the person duly authorized to act as a purchasing agent for the city.

(2)  Whenever any city is required by law to receive bids for purchases, construction, repairs, or any other purpose requiring the expenditure of funds, that city shall keep on file all bids received, together with proof of advertisement by publication or otherwise, for:

(a)  at least three years following the letting of any contract pursuant to those bids; or

(b)  three years following the first advertisement for the bids, if all bids pursuant to that advertisement are rejected.



Amended by Chapter 206, 2004 General Session

